New York, session 2025-2026, S10196.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1180-i to read as follows: 3 § 1180-i. Owner liability for failure of operator to comply with 4 certain posted maximum speed limits; city of Amsterdam. (a) 1. Notwith- 5 standing any other provision of law, the city of Amsterdam is hereby 6 authorized to establish a demonstration program imposing monetary 7 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 8 to comply with posted maximum speed limits in a school speed zone within 9 such city (i) when a school speed limit is in effect as provided in 10 paragraphs one and two of subdivision (c) of section eleven hundred 11 eighty of this article or (ii) when other speed limits are in effect as 12 provided in subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred 13 eighty of this article during the following times: (A) on school days 14 during school hours and one hour before and one hour after the school 15 day, and (B) a period during student activities at the school and up to 16 thirty minutes immediately before and up to thirty minutes immediately 17 after such student activities. Such demonstration program shall empower 18 the city of Amsterdam to install photo speed violation monitoring 19 systems within no more than five school speed zones within such city at 20 any one time and to operate such systems within such zones (iii) when a 21 school speed limit is in effect as provided in paragraphs one and two of 22 subdivision (c) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article or (iv) 23 when other speed limits are in effect as provided in subdivision (b), 24 (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article during EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15680-03-6 S. 10196--A 2 1 the following times: (A) on school days during school hours and one hour 2 before and one hour after the school day, and (B) a period during 3 student activities at the school and up to thirty minutes immediately 4 before and up to thirty minutes immediately after such student activ- 5 ities. In selecting a school speed zone in which to install and operate 6 a photo speed violation monitoring system, the city shall consider 7 criteria including, but not limited to, the speed data, crash history, 8 and the roadway geometry applicable to such school speed zone. 9 2. No photo speed violation monitoring system shall be used in a 10 school speed zone unless (i) on the day it is to be used it has success- 11 fully passed a self-test of its functions; and (ii) it has undergone an 12 annual calibration check performed pursuant to paragraph four of this 13 subdivision. The city shall install signs giving notice that a photo 14 speed violation monitoring system is in use to be mounted on advance 15 warning signs notifying motor vehicle operators of such upcoming school 16 speed zone and/or on speed limit signs applicable within such school 17 speed zone, in conformance with standards established in the MUTCD. 18 3. Operators of photo speed violation monitoring systems shall have 19 completed training in the procedures for setting up, testing, and oper- 20 ating such systems. Each such operator shall complete and sign a daily 21 set-up log for each such system that such operator operates that (i) 22 states the date and time when, and the location where, the system was 23 set up that day, and (ii) states that such operator successfully 24 performed, and the system passed, the self-tests of such system before 25 producing a recorded image that day. The city shall retain each such 26 daily log until the later of the date on which the photo speed violation 27 monitoring system to which it applies has been permanently removed from 28 use or the final resolution of all cases involving notices of liability 29 issued based on photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other 30 recorded images produced by such system. 31 4. Each photo speed violation monitoring system shall undergo an annu- 32 al calibration check performed by an independent calibration laboratory 33 which shall issue a signed certificate of calibration. The city shall 34 keep each such annual certificate of calibration on file until the final 35 resolution of all cases involving a notice of liability issued during 36 such year which were based on photographs, microphotographs, videotape 37 or other recorded images produced by such photo speed violation monitor- 38 ing system. 39 5. (i) Such demonstration program shall utilize necessary technologies 40 to ensure, to the extent practicable, that photographs, microphoto- 41 graphs, videotape or other recorded images produced by such photo speed 42 violation monitoring systems shall not include images that identify the 43 driver, the passengers, or the contents of the vehicle. Provided, howev- 44 er, that no notice of liability issued pursuant to this section shall be 45 dismissed solely because such a photograph, microphotograph, videotape 46 or other recorded image allows for the identification of the driver, the 47 passengers, or the contents of vehicles where the city shows that it 48 made reasonable efforts to comply with the provisions of this paragraph 49 in such case. 50 (ii) Photographs, microphotographs, videotape or any other recorded 51 image from a photo speed violation monitoring system shall be for the 52 exclusive use of the city for the purpose of the adjudication of liabil- 53 ity imposed pursuant to this section and of the owner receiving a notice 54 of liability pursuant to this section, and shall be destroyed by the 55 city upon the final resolution of the notice of liability to which such 56 photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded images S. 10196--A 3 1 relate, or one year following the date of issuance of such notice of 2 liability, whichever is later. Notwithstanding the provisions of any 3 other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, photographs, microphoto- 4 graphs, videotape or any other recorded image from a photo speed 5 violation monitoring system shall not be open to the public, nor subject 6 to civil or criminal process or discovery, nor used by any court or 7 administrative or adjudicatory body in any action or proceeding therein 8 except that which is necessary for the adjudication of a notice of 9 liability issued pursuant to this section, and no public entity or 10 employee, officer or agent thereof shall disclose such information, 11 except that such photographs, microphotographs, videotape or any other 12 recorded images from such systems: 13 (A) shall be available for inspection and copying and use by the motor 14 vehicle owner and operator for so long as such photographs, microphoto- 15 graphs, videotape or other recorded images are required to be maintained 16 or are maintained by such public entity, employee, officer or agent; and 17 (B) (1) shall be furnished when described in a search warrant issued 18 by a court authorized to issue such a search warrant pursuant to article 19 six hundred ninety of the criminal procedure law or a federal court 20 authorized to issue such a search warrant under federal law, where such 21 search warrant states that there is reasonable cause to believe such 22 information constitutes evidence of, or tends to demonstrate that, a 23 misdemeanor or felony offense was committed in this state or another 24 state, or that a particular person participated in the commission of a 25 misdemeanor or felony offense in this state or another state, provided, 26 however, that if such offense was against the laws of another state, the 27 court shall only issue a warrant if the conduct comprising such offense 28 would, if occurring in this state, constitute a misdemeanor or felony 29 against the laws of this state; and 30 (2) shall be furnished in response to a subpoena duces tecum signed by 31 a judge of competent jurisdiction and issued pursuant to article six 32 hundred ten of the criminal procedure law or a judge or magistrate of a 33 federal court authorized to issue such a subpoena duces tecum under 34 federal law, where the judge finds and the subpoena states that there is 35 reasonable cause to believe such information is relevant and material to 36 the prosecution, or the defense, or the investigation by an authorized 37 law enforcement official, of the alleged commission of a misdemeanor or 38 felony in this state or another state, provided, however, that if such 39 offense was against the laws of another state, such judge or magistrate 40 shall only issue such subpoena if the conduct comprising such offense 41 would, if occurring in this state, constitute a misdemeanor or felony in 42 this state; and 43 (3) may, if lawfully obtained pursuant to this clause and clause (A) 44 of this subparagraph and otherwise admissible, be used in such criminal 45 action or proceeding. 46 (b) If the city of Amsterdam establishes a demonstration program 47 pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section, the owner of a vehicle 48 shall be liable for a penalty imposed pursuant to this section if such 49 vehicle was used or operated with the permission of the owner, express 50 or implied, within a school speed zone in violation of subdivision (c) 51 or during the times authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) of this 52 section in violation of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section 53 eleven hundred eighty of this article, such vehicle was traveling at a 54 speed of more than ten miles per hour above the posted speed limit in 55 effect within such school speed zone, and such violation is evidenced by 56 information obtained from a photo speed violation monitoring system; S. 10196--A 4 1 provided however that no owner of a vehicle shall be liable for a penal- 2 ty imposed pursuant to this section where the operator of such vehicle 3 has been convicted of the underlying violation of subdivision (b), (c), 4 (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. 5 (c) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 6 following meanings: 7 1. "manual on uniform traffic control devices" or "MUTCD" shall mean 8 the manual and specifications for a uniform system of traffic control 9 devices maintained by the commissioner of transportation pursuant to 10 section sixteen hundred eighty of this chapter; 11 2. "owner" shall have the meaning provided in article two-B of this 12 chapter; 13 3. "photo speed violation monitoring system" shall mean a vehicle 14 sensor installed to work in conjunction with a speed measuring device 15 which automatically produces two or more photographs, two or more micro- 16 photographs, a videotape or other recorded images of each vehicle at the 17 time it is used or operated in a school speed zone in violation of 18 subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty 19 of this article in accordance with the provisions of this section; and 20 4. "school speed zone" shall mean a distance not to exceed one thou- 21 sand three hundred twenty feet on a highway passing a school building, 22 entrance or exit of a school abutting on the highway. 23 (d) A certificate, sworn to or affirmed by a technician employed by 24 the city of Amsterdam, or a facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of 25 photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded images 26 produced by a photo speed violation monitoring system, shall be prima 27 facie evidence of the facts contained therein. Any photographs, micro- 28 photographs, videotape or other recorded images evidencing such a 29 violation shall include at least two date and time stamped images of the 30 rear of the motor vehicle that include the same stationary object near 31 the motor vehicle and shall be available for inspection reasonably in 32 advance of and at any proceeding to adjudicate the liability for such 33 violation pursuant to this section. 34 (e) An owner liable for a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) 35 or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to a 36 demonstration program established pursuant to this section shall be 37 liable for monetary penalties in accordance with a schedule of fines and 38 penalties to be set forth in such local law or ordinance, except that if 39 the city of Amsterdam, by local law, has authorized the adjudication of 40 such owner liability by a parking violations bureau, such schedule shall 41 be promulgated by such bureau. The liability of the owner pursuant to 42 this section shall not exceed fifty dollars for each violation; 43 provided, however, that such local law or ordinance may provide for an 44 additional penalty not in excess of twenty-five dollars for each 45 violation for the failure to respond to a notice of liability within the 46 prescribed time period. 47 (f) An imposition of liability under the demonstration program estab- 48 lished pursuant to this section shall not be deemed a conviction as an 49 operator and shall not be made part of the operating record of the 50 person upon whom such liability is imposed nor shall it be used for 51 insurance purposes in the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage. 52 (g) 1. A notice of liability shall be sent by first class mail to each 53 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of subdivision 54 (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this arti- 55 cle pursuant to this section, within fourteen business days if such 56 owner is a resident of this state and within forty-five business days if S. 10196--A 5 1 such owner is a non-resident. Personal delivery on the owner shall not 2 be required. A manual or automatic record of mailing prepared in the 3 ordinary course of business shall be prima facie evidence of the facts 4 contained therein. 5 2. A notice of liability shall contain the name and address of the 6 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of subdivision 7 (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this arti- 8 cle pursuant to this section, the registration number of the vehicle 9 involved in such violation, the location where such violation took 10 place, the date and time of such violation, the identification number of 11 the camera which recorded the violation or other document locator 12 number, at least two date and time stamped images of the rear of the 13 motor vehicle that include the same stationary object near the motor 14 vehicle, and the certificate charging the liability. 15 3. The notice of liability shall contain information advising the 16 person charged of the manner and the time in which such person may 17 contest the liability alleged in the notice. Such notice of liability 18 shall also contain a prominent warning to advise the person charged that 19 failure to contest in the manner and time provided shall be deemed an 20 admission of liability and that a default judgment may be entered there- 21 on. 22 4. The notice of liability shall be prepared and mailed by the city of 23 Amsterdam, or by any other entity authorized by the city to prepare and 24 mail such notice of liability. 25 (h) Adjudication of the liability imposed upon owners by this section 26 shall be by a traffic violations bureau established pursuant to section 27 three hundred seventy of the general municipal law where the violation 28 occurred or, if there be none, by the court having jurisdiction over 29 traffic infractions where the violation occurred, except that if the 30 city of Amsterdam has established an administrative tribunal to hear and 31 determine complaints of traffic infractions constituting parking, stand- 32 ing or stopping violations such city may, by local law, authorize such 33 adjudication by such tribunal. 34 (i) If an owner receives a notice of liability pursuant to this 35 section for any time period during which the vehicle or the number plate 36 or plates of such vehicle was reported to the police department as 37 having been stolen, it shall be a valid defense to an allegation of 38 liability for a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of 39 section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this section 40 that the vehicle or the number plate or plates of such vehicle had been 41 reported to the police as stolen prior to the time the violation 42 occurred and had not been recovered by such time. For purposes of 43 asserting the defense provided by this subdivision, it shall be suffi- 44 cient that a certified copy of the police report on the stolen vehicle 45 or number plate or plates of such vehicle be sent by first class mail to 46 the traffic violations bureau, court having jurisdiction or parking 47 violations bureau. 48 (j) 1. Where the adjudication of liability imposed upon owners pursu- 49 ant to this section is by a traffic violations bureau or a court having 50 jurisdiction, an owner who is a lessor of a vehicle to which a notice of 51 liability was issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of this section shall 52 not be liable for the violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) 53 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this 54 section, provided that the owner sends to the traffic violations bureau 55 or court having jurisdiction a copy of the rental, lease or other such 56 contract document covering such vehicle on the date of the violation, S. 10196--A 6 1 with the name and address of the lessee clearly legible, within thirty- 2 seven days after receiving notice from the bureau or court of the date 3 and time of such violation, together with the other information 4 contained in the original notice of liability. Failure to send such 5 information within such thirty-seven day time period shall render the 6 owner liable for the penalty prescribed by this section. Where the 7 lessor complies with the provisions of this paragraph, the lessee of 8 such vehicle on the date of such violation shall be deemed to be the 9 owner of such vehicle for purposes of this section, shall be subject to 10 liability for the violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of 11 section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this section 12 and shall be sent a notice of liability pursuant to subdivision (g) of 13 this section. 14 2. (i) If the city of Amsterdam, by local law, has authorized the 15 adjudication of liability imposed upon owners by this section by a park- 16 ing violations bureau, an owner who is a lessor of a vehicle to which a 17 notice of liability was issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of this 18 section shall not be liable for the violation of subdivision (b), (c), 19 (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursu- 20 ant to this section, provided that: 21 (A) prior to the violation, the lessor has filed with the bureau in 22 accordance with the provisions of section two hundred thirty-nine of 23 this chapter; and 24 (B) within thirty-seven days after receiving notice from the bureau of 25 the date and time of a liability, together with the other information 26 contained in the original notice of liability, the lessor submits to the 27 bureau the correct name and address of the lessee of the vehicle identi- 28 fied in the notice of liability at the time of such violation, together 29 with such other additional information contained in the rental, lease or 30 other contract document, as may be reasonably required by the bureau 31 pursuant to regulations that may be promulgated for such purpose. 32 (ii) Failure to comply with clause (B) of subparagraph (i) of this 33 paragraph shall render the owner liable for the penalty prescribed in 34 this section. 35 (iii) Where the lessor complies with the provisions of this paragraph, 36 the lessee of such vehicle on the date of such violation shall be deemed 37 to be the owner of such vehicle for purposes of this section, shall be 38 subject to liability for such violation pursuant to this section and 39 shall be sent a notice of liability pursuant to subdivision (g) of this 40 section. 41 (k) 1. If the owner liable for a violation of subdivision (c) or (d) 42 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this 43 section was not the operator of the vehicle at the time of the 44 violation, the owner may maintain an action for indemnification against 45 the operator. 46 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no owner of a 47 vehicle shall be subject to a monetary fine imposed pursuant to this 48 section if the operator of such vehicle was operating such vehicle with- 49 out the consent of the owner at the time such operator operated such 50 vehicle in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section 51 eleven hundred eighty of this article. For purposes of this subdivision 52 there shall be a presumption that the operator of such vehicle was oper- 53 ating such vehicle with the consent of the owner at the time such opera- 54 tor operated such vehicle in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) 55 or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. S. 10196--A 7 1 (l) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability 2 of an operator of a vehicle for any violation of subdivision (c) or (d) 3 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. 4 (m) If the city adopts a demonstration program pursuant to subdivision 5 (a) of this section it shall conduct a study and submit an annual report 6 on the results of the use of photo devices to the governor, the tempo- 7 rary president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly on or 8 before the first day of June next succeeding the effective date of this 9 section and on the same date in each succeeding year in which the demon- 10 stration program is operable. Such report shall include: 11 1. the locations where and dates when photo speed violation monitoring 12 systems were used; 13 2. the aggregate number, type and severity of crashes, fatalities, 14 injuries and property damage reported within all school speed zones 15 within the city, to the extent the information is maintained by the 16 department of motor vehicles of this state; 17 3. the aggregate number, type and severity of crashes, fatalities, 18 injuries and property damage reported within school speed zones where 19 photo speed violation monitoring systems were used, to the extent the 20 information is maintained by the department of motor vehicles of this 21 state; 22 4. the number of violations recorded within all school speed zones 23 within the city, in the aggregate on a daily, weekly and monthly basis; 24 5. the number of violations recorded within each school speed zone 25 where a photo speed violation monitoring system is used, in the aggre- 26 gate on a daily, weekly and monthly basis; 27 6. the number of violations recorded within all school speed zones 28 within the city that were: 29 (i) more than ten but not more than twenty miles per hour over the 30 posted speed limit; 31 (ii) more than twenty but not more than thirty miles per hour over the 32 posted speed limit; 33 (iii) more than thirty but not more than forty miles per hour over the 34 posted speed limit; and 35 (iv) more than forty miles per hour over the posted speed limit; 36 7. the number of violations recorded within each school speed zone 37 where a photo speed violation monitoring system is used that were: 38 (i) more than ten but not more than twenty miles per hour over the 39 posted speed limit; 40 (ii) more than twenty but not more than thirty miles per hour over the 41 posted speed limit; 42 (iii) more than thirty but not more than forty miles per hour over the 43 posted speed limit; and 44 (iv) more than forty miles per hour over the posted speed limit; 45 8. the total number of notices of liability issued for violations 46 recorded by such systems; 47 9. the number of fines and total amount of fines paid after the first 48 notice of liability issued for violations recorded by such systems; 49 10. the number of violations adjudicated and the results of such adju- 50 dications including breakdowns of dispositions made for violations 51 recorded by such systems; 52 11. the total amount of revenue realized by the city in connection 53 with the program; 54 12. the expenses incurred by the city in connection with the program; 55 and 56 13. the quality of the adjudication process and its results. S. 10196--A 8 1 (n) It shall be a defense to any prosecution for a violation of subdi- 2 vision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of 3 this article pursuant to this section that such photo speed violation 4 monitoring system was malfunctioning at the time of the alleged 5 violation. 6 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 87 of the public officers law is amended 7 by adding a new paragraph (x) to read as follows: 8 (x) are photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded 9 images prepared under the authority of section eleven hundred eighty-i 10 of the vehicle and traffic law. 11 § 3. The purchase or lease of equipment for a demonstration program 12 established pursuant to section 1180-i of the vehicle and traffic law, 13 as added by section one of this act, shall be subject to the provisions 14 of section 103 of the general municipal law. 15 § 4. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 16 have become a law and shall expire December 31, 2031, when upon such 17 date the provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed. Effective 18 immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regu- 19 lation necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective 20 date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective 21 date.